Missouri, session 2026, HB2426.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 431.061, RSMo, is repealed and four new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 1.390, 1.391, 162.192, and 431.061, to read as follows:
1.390. 1. A parent has a fundamental liberty and fundamental interest in the
care, custody, and control of such parent's child, including the right to direct the
upbringing, education, health care, and mental health of the child free from government
interference.
2. A governmental authority shall not interfere with the fundamental right of a
parent to direct the upbringing, education, health care, and mental health of that
parent's child, unless the governmental authority demonstrates that the interference
furthers a compelling governmental interest as applied to the parent and the child, and
is the least restrictive means of furthering that compelling governmental interest. Any
such interference shall be subject to judicial review by a court of competent jurisdiction,
which shall determine if the governmental authority has satisfied the burden of proof set
forth in this subsection.
3. As used in this section, "parent" shall have the same meaning as such term is
defined in subdivision (5) of section 211.021.
4. As used in this section, "child" means any unemancipated person who has not
attained the age of eighteen years and who has not been adjudicated as an adult in a
criminal proceeding and subsequently been committed to the custody of the department
of corrections.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2426 2
5. This section applies to all state and local laws, resolutions, and ordinances and
to the implementation of such laws, resolutions, and ordinances, whether statutory or
otherwise, and whether adopted before or after August 28, 2026.
6. Nothing in this section or section 1.391 shall be construed as allowing any
person to cause physical injury to another person, to possess a weapon otherwise
prohibited by law, to fail to provide monetary support for a child, or to fail to provide
health care for a child suffering from a life-threatening condition.
1.391. 1. All parental rights are exclusively reserved to a parent of a child
without obstruction by or interference from this state, any political subdivision of this
state, any other governmental entity, or any other institution, including without
limitation, the following rights and responsibilities:
(1) To direct the education of the child, including the right to choose a public
school, private school, parochial school, parish school, home school, or family paced
education school, and the right to make reasonable choices within public schools for the
education of the child;
(2) To access and review all written and electronic educational records relating
to the child that are controlled by or in the possession of a school;
(3) To direct the upbringing of the child;
(4) To direct the moral or religious training of the child;
(5) To make and consent in writing to all physical and mental health care
decisions for the child;
(6) To access and review all health and medical records of the child;
(7) To consent in writing before a biometric scan of the child is made, shared, or
stored, except where such collection is required under chapter 43 or chapter 589;
(8) To consent in writing before any record of the child's blood or
deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) is created, stored, or shared, unless authorized pursuant
to a court order or required under chapter 43 or chapter 589;
(9) To consent in writing before any governmental authority makes a video or
voice recording of the child, unless, without abrogating rights secured under the Fourth
Amendment to the United States Constitution, the video or voice recording is made
during or as a part of:
(a) A court proceeding;
(b) A law enforcement investigation;
(c) A forensic interview in a criminal or department of social services
investigation;
(d) The security or surveillance of buildings or grounds; or
(e) A photo identification card;

HCS HB 2426 3
(10) To be notified promptly if any governmental authority suspects that abuse,
neglect, or any criminal offense has been committed against the child, unless the
governmental authority reasonably believes that notifying the parent is likely to
endanger the life or physical safety of the child;
(11) To opt the child out of any personal analysis, evaluation, survey, or data
collection by a school district that would capture data for inclusion in the statewide
longitudinal student data system except what is necessary and essential for establishing
a student's educational record for a student of the school district;
(12) The right to have the child excused from school attendance for religious
purposes;
(13) The right to participate in parent-teacher organizations and other school
organizations that are sanctioned by the board of education of a school district;
(14) To receive, upon first contact with a representative of the department of
social services, an accurate written itemization containing all details of any reports or
allegations concerning abuse or neglect of the parent's child which the department of
social services has received, excluding only the name of the person who provided the
reports or made the allegations; and
(15) To view a publicly available, readily identifiable, and easily accessible
accounting of all financial transactions conducted with school district funds without
being required to submit a formal request or otherwise make direct contact with the
school district in which the parent's child is enrolled.
2. Except for law enforcement personnel, a governmental authority shall not
encourage or coerce a child to withhold information from the child's parent; nor shall a
governmental authority withhold from a child's parent information that is relevant to
the physical, emotional, or mental health of the child.
3. A parent who believes his or her rights have been violated under this section
or section 1.390 may assert that violation as a claim or defense in a judicial or
administrative proceeding, regardless of whether the government is a party to the
proceeding, and obtain appropriate relief against the government, including declaratory
relief, injunctive relief, compensatory damages, and reasonable attorney's fees and
costs.
162.192. 1. For purposes of this section, "financial ledger" means a searchable,
machine-readable, publicly accessible database maintained by a school district that:
(1) Sets forth all financial transactions conducted with school district funds,
including, but not limited to, the school funds established pursuant to section 165.011;
(2) Is available without login credentials, registration, or fees;

HCS HB 2426 4
(3) Is downloadable and exportable in formats including, but not limited to,
comma-separated values (CSV) format and Microsoft Excel format;
(4) Records all transactions using Missouri financial accounting manual
classification categories, as applicable; and
(5) Includes the following minimum required data fields for each financial
transaction, and is searchable and filterable by such fields, at minimum:
(a) Transaction date;
(b) Transaction amount;
(c) Revenue or expenditure designation;
(d) Fund code;
(e) Function code;
(f) Object code;
(g) Vendor or payee name; and
(h) Description or memo field.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each school district
shall maintain a financial ledger on its publicly accessible website. The homepage of
each public school's website shall include a direct link to the financial ledger of the
school district that has oversight responsibility for that public school. The link shall
make the financial ledger accessible within one click, shall be clearly labeled as a link to
the school district's financial ledger, and shall be functional and mobile-responsive. The
department may provide standardized language or icons that public schools may use for
the purpose of ensuring compliance with this subsection.
3. A school district's financial ledger shall be updated at least monthly. Details
of each calendar month's financial transactions shall be posted no later than forty-five
days after the close of that calendar month.
4. For historical record keeping purposes, a school district shall maintain
complete financial ledger data on its publicly accessible website for no fewer than five
prior fiscal years.
5. A school district may redact protected personal information on the financial
ledger only to the extent required by applicable law. Vendor names, amounts, and
accounting codes shall not be redacted. Payroll data may be presented in aggregated
form where disclosure of individual information is restricted.
6. Debt obligations shall be posted in a separate section of the financial ledger,
with disclosure of the following information:
(1) Outstanding debt balances;
(2) Issuance dates;
(3) Repayment schedules;

HCS HB 2426 5
(4) Annual debt service amounts; and
(5) Debt service as a percentage of total expenditures.
7. The department may provide or approve standardized templates or platforms
a school district may use to comply with the provisions of this section. A school district
may use a third-party template or platform that is approved by the department.
8. The department may provide guidance to assist school districts in complying
with the provisions of this section. Such guidance may include:
(1) High-level expenditure summaries by classification category under the
Missouri financial accounting manual;
(2) Standardized definitions of terms to be used in the financial ledger; and
(3) Clear explanations of methodology and limitations applicable to the
compilation and presentation of financial ledger data.
9. School districts shall annually certify compliance with this section to the
department. The department shall promulgate rules establishing procedures and
timelines for school districts to certify compliance.
10. If the department finds that any school district has violated a provision of
this section, the department may withhold state aid to which the school district is
entitled under chapter 163 until the school district proves to the satisfaction of the
department that the school district is no longer in violation of this section.
11. The department shall establish a process for members of the public to file
complaints with the department if they believe a school district has violated any
provision of this section. The department may establish a public compliance dashboard
on the department's website to enable members of the public to check whether a
particular school district is certified as in compliance with the provisions of this section.
12. The department shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
431.061. 1. In addition to such other persons as may be so authorized and
empowered, any one of the following persons if otherwise competent to contract, is
authorized and empowered to consent, either orally or otherwise, to any surgical, medical, or
other treatment or procedures, including immunizations, not prohibited by law:

HCS HB 2426 6
(1) Any adult eighteen years of age or older for himself;
(2) Any parent for his minor child in his legal custody;
(3) Any minor who has been lawfully married and any minor parent or legal
custodian of a child for himself, his child and any child in his legal custody;
(4) Any minor [for himself] in case of[:
(a) Pregnancy, but excluding abortions;
(b) Venereal disease;
(c) Drug or substance abuse including those referred to in chapter 195] pregnancy,
but excluding abortions;
(5) Any adult standing in loco parentis, whether serving formally or not, for his minor
charge in case of emergency as defined in section 431.063;
(6) Any guardian of the person for his ward;
(7) Any relative caregiver of a minor child as provided for under section 431.058.
2. The provisions of sections 431.061 and 431.063 shall be liberally construed, and all
relationships set forth in subsection 1 of this section shall include the adoptive and step-
relationship as well as the natural relationship and the relationship by the half blood as well as
by the whole blood.
3. A consent by one person so authorized and empowered shall be sufficient
notwithstanding that there are other persons so authorized and empowered or that such other
persons shall refuse or decline to consent or shall protest against the proposed surgical,
medical or other treatment or procedures.
4. Any person acting in good faith and not having been put on notice to the contrary
shall be justified in relying on the representations of any person purporting to give such
consent, including, but not limited to, his identity, his age, his marital status, and his
relationship to any other person for whom the consent is purportedly given.
✔